California statutes. Education Code
(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), if each of the county committees on school district organization does not approve the petition as required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), the petition may be submitted to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for approval. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction approves the petition, the governing board may acquire the site.

(d) In approving the acquisition of a site pursuant to this section, the county committees on school district organization and the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall consider the extent to which the following are met:

(1) The proposed site acquisition will not promote racial or ethnic discrimination or segregation.

(2) The proposed site acquisition will not result in any substantial increase in costs to the state.

(3) The proposed site acquisition will not significantly disrupt the educational programs in the school districts affected by the proposed site acquisition and will continue to promote sound education performance in those school districts.

(4) The proposed site acquisition will not result in a significant increase in school housing costs.

(5) The proposed site acquisition is not primarily designed to result in a significant increase in property values causing financial advantage to property owners because territory was transferred from one school district to an adjoining school district.

(6) The proposed site acquisition will not cause a substantial negative effect on the fiscal management or fiscal status of any school district affected by the proposed site acquisition.

(e) The power of eminent domain may be used for the purposes of this section.

(f) A schoolsite is contiguous for the purpose of this section although separated from the boundaries of the district by a road, street, stream, or other natural or artificial barrier or right-of-way.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 798, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17218.

The governing board of a school district which has been included in a school district unification proposal approved by the electors of the territory involved pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4206) of Part 3, may, prior to the time the new unified school district becomes effective for all purposes, acquire a site for a school building at any place within the new unified school district, and upon the acquisition of the site it shall become a part of the district pending the date when the new unified school district becomes effective for all purposes. The site shall not be acquired until the county committee on school district organization of the county or of each of the counties concerned has received the proposal for acquisition of the site and reported its recommendations thereon to the governing boards of the districts concerned and to each county superintendent of schools concerned. The report of the county committee shall be made within 60 days from the time the proposal for acquisition of the site was submitted to it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17219.

(a) Whenever a school district acquires or has acquired a site for school purposes, as determined by the State Allocation Board, and does not use the site within (1) five years of the date of acquisition for the kindergarten, if any, and any of grades 1 to 8, inclusive, maintained by an elementary school district or a unified school district, or, (2) seven years of the date of acquisition for any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, maintained by a high school district or a unified school district, or if a school district has a site at any grade level that has previously been used but has not been used for school purposes within the preceding five years, the school district shall be subject to nonuse payments, unless the State Allocation Board, from time to time, makes a determination that the
 school district will utilize the property for the purpose for which it was intended within a reasonable period of time, in a specific amount for each additional year in which the site is retained and not used by the district beyond the foregoing specified periods, except the first additional year shall be deemed to end not earlier than April 30, 1973.

(b) Payment shall not be required under this section as to any site having a value of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or less. Commencing on January 1, 1988, and annually thereafter, the State Allocation Board shall increase this exemption figure by the amount of the current fiscal year inflation adjustment specified in Section 42238.1, if any.

(c) The payments required shall be computed by the Executive Officer of the State Allocation Board and certified to the Controller, and payments shall be equal to one one-hundredth (1/100)
 of the original purchase price of the site modified by either a factor reflecting the change in assessed value of all lands in the state from the date of purchase of the site to the current date or any other factor that in the determination of the State Allocation Board is applicable to the site under consideration.

(d) Whenever the State Allocation Board has determined that a school district in good faith has, within the preceding year, advertised the schoolsite for sale to the highest bidder pursuant to the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 17455) of Chapter 4 of Part 10.5 and has received no bids that in the judgment of the State Allocation Board reflect the fair market value of the property, the Executive Officer of the State Allocation Board shall not compute any nonuse payments for the site for a period of one year beyond the date of the determination.

(e) Nonuse payments shall not be required for any year with respect to a schoolsite that for one-half or more of the number of days of that year has been utilized for any of the following purposes:

(1) By the school district, or by any other governmental entity pursuant to agreement with the school district, for school purposes, for use as a civic center, or for community playground, playing field, or other outdoor recreational purposes. For purposes of this paragraph, “civic center” means a site used for one or more of the purposes described in Section 40041.

(2) By the State Allocation Board, pursuant to agreement with the school district, for the storage of emergency portable classrooms.

(3) By the school district, or by any other public or private entity pursuant to agreement with the school
 district, for the operation of a child care program.

(f) Nonuse payments shall not be required for any year with respect to a schoolsite that was leased at least one-half of the days in that year in a manner that subjected the site to property taxes equal to the taxes that would have been paid if the site had been sold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 54.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

17220.

If the State Allocation Board determines a school district to be exempt from the requirement to make nonuse payments for any year as to any schoolsite on any basis authorized under subdivision (e) or (f) of Section 17219, that exemption shall continue to apply to that schoolsite for each subsequent year for which the superintendent of the school district certifies to the State Allocation Board, on a timely basis, that the basis of exemption continues to exist.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17221.

The amount of any nonuse payments required of any school district under Section 17219 shall be reduced, without regard to fiscal year, by the amount of the proceeds, resulting from the lease of district property that is subject to that section, that are expended by the district the payment of bond debt service costs that are directly related to the actual construction of school facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17222.

The Controller shall, during the next fiscal year following that in which the Executive Officer of the State Allocation Board certifies to him or her the amount of payment, deduct the total amount of the payment of each district in equal amounts from each of the February, March, April and May installments of the apportionments made to the district from the State School Fund under Sections 46304, 46305, and 41050, Sections 41330 to 41343, inclusive, and Sections 41600 to 41972, inclusive, whichever are in effect. However, in no event shall the deductions exceed an amount which would result in a district’s receiving, in any school year, from the State School Fund, less than one hundred twenty dollars ($120) per pupil in average daily attendance in the district during the preceding school year. On order of the Controller, the amount so deducted shall be transferred to the State School Site Utilization Fund which is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17223.

(a) Whenever a school district has either begun to use an unused site or has sold that site within two years of the date the Controller, pursuant to Section 17222, has deducted a certified nonuse payment from the district’s State School Fund apportionment, the State Allocation Board shall certify that fact to the Controller. The Controller shall then cease to withhold any additional payments and shall return to the district from the State School Site Utilization Fund the payments, without interest, which had been withheld for the particular site during the prior fiscal year and the current fiscal year.

(b) If the school district begins to use or has sold the site more than two years after the aforesaid date, the State Allocation Board shall so certify to the Controller and no further payments shall be withheld as specified in Section 17222.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17224.

(a) Any funds in the State School Site Utilization Fund, including interest, that are not subject to return to a school district pursuant to Section 17223 shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be allocated for purposes of administering the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10).

(b) Any unencumbered funds in the State School Deferred Maintenance Fund after July 1, 2014, shall be transferred to the State School Site Utilization Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 17.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Disposal of Sites [17230. - 17234.]

17230.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 17455) of Chapter 4 and in addition to the requirements placed upon school districts pursuant to Section 54222 of the Government Code, the governing board of a school district may sell, for less than fair market value, a schoolsite that is deemed to be surplus
 property of the
 school district and for which a charter school has not accepted an offer to purchase or lease pursuant to Section 17457.5, to a park district, city, or county in which the school district is wholly or partially situated for use or partial use as park or recreational purposes or open-space purposes if the governing board of the school district adopts a resolution specifying that it will sell or transfer the property for less than fair market value to such an entity for that purpose. The offer to sell shall be made in writing, but the terms by which the property
 may be sold or transferred need not be specifically provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 38, Sec. 37.1.   (SB 1016)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

17231.

The sale or transfer may be made for cash and other valuable consideration, or for other valuable consideration, as deemed appropriate by the governing board of the school district. The sale or transfer may be made without first taking a vote of the electors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17232.

A school district’s offer to sell or transfer the land shall be made to all park districts, cities, and counties in which the school district is wholly or partially situated pursuant to this article and shall remain open for not less than 60 days. The sale or transfer shall be made to whichever public entity first accepts the offer, or whichever public entity can negotiate satisfactorily for the purchase or transfer of the surplus land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17233.

Notwithstanding Article 4 (commencing with Section 17455) of Chapter 4 of this part, Article 8 (commencing with Section 54220) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, or any other provision of law, any unimproved real property that was acquired by a school district pursuant to Section 35270.5, which property the governing board of the school district has deemed to be surplus property of the district, may not be sold to any person or entity within 20 years of its acquisition by the district unless the district has first made a bona fide offer to sell the property to the person or entity that owned the property at the time of its acquisition by the district or, if applicable, offered to that person or entity a right of first refusal of any bona fide offer acceptable to the district made by another to purchase the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17234.

The failure to comply with any provision of this article shall not invalidate any sale or transfer of real property to a purchaser or encumbrancer for value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. New Schools Relief Act of 1979 [17240. - 17245.]

17240.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the New Schools Relief Act of 1979.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17241.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that because of the adoption of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, imposing limits on the ability of school districts to levy and collect property taxes, it is necessary to create new revenues for the construction of school facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17242.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to provide opportunities for school districts, the state, and the private sector to cooperate to provide needed school facilities in growth impacted districts, and to facilitate innovative financing and other techniques for growth impacted districts to help meet new school construction needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17243.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Board” means the State Allocation Board.

(b) “A school district with an anticipated increase in enrollment” means a school district in which the level of enrollment is projected by the district to be higher during any of the five years, including the year in which the projection is made, than the year preceding the year in which the projection is made. Projections shall be made pursuant to regulations adopted by the board.

(c) “Private developers” means individuals or corporations owning land, facilities, or both; or, in the business of developing land for construction purposes, constructing facilities on developed land, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17244.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a school district with an anticipated increase in enrollment is authorized to lease land and facilities from a private developer with funds provided by one or more of the following sources, subject to regulations established by the board:

(a) Funds provided by the state for the purposes of school construction (1) in the Budget Act, (2) in separate legislation, (3) from the sale of bonds, the issuance of which was approved by the voters of the state prior to January 1, 1980, provided that the purposes for which the issuance of the bonds was approved encompassed the purposes of this section; or (4) from the sale of bonds, the issuance of which may be approved on or after January 1, 1980, by the voters of the state for the purposes of school construction, among other purposes.

(b) Funds the district has borrowed from the state and which the district is in the process of repaying, provided that nothing in this section shall be construed as terminating, delaying, or otherwise interrupting the district’s schedule of repayments for the funds.

(c) Available capital reserves from the district’s general fund or special funds of the district, provided the purposes of this section do not conflict with the purposes for which the funds may be used.

(d) Proceeds from the sale or lease of unneeded facilities, provided that nothing in this section shall be construed to have any of the following effects:

(1) To terminate, delay, or otherwise interrupt the schedule of regular repayments for the district’s obligations to the state.

(2) To relieve the district from any obligation to the state, except to the degree that such district may retain that portion of the proceeds from the sale or lease of unneeded facilities necessary to lease land and facilities pursuant to this section.

(3) To permit the district to retain any proceeds otherwise owing to the state from the lease or sale of unneeded facilities in excess of the amount necessary to lease land and facilities pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17245.

Notwithstanding any other law, a school district with an anticipated increase in enrollment is authorized to construct school facilities authorized within state school building aid standards, and subject to regulations established by the board, with funds from the following sources:

(a) Available capital reserves from the district’s general fund or special funds of the district, provided the purposes of this section do not conflict with the purposes for which the funds may be used.

(b) Proceeds from the sale or lease of unneeded facilities provided that nothing in this section shall be construed to have any of the following effects:

(1) To terminate, delay, or otherwise interrupt the schedule of regular repayments for the district’s obligations to the state.

(2) To relieve the district from any obligation to the state, except to the degree that the district may retain that portion of the proceeds from the sale or lease of unneeded facilities necessary to construct facilities pursuant to this section.

(3) To permit the district to retain any proceeds otherwise owing to the state from the lease or sale of unneeded facilities in excess of the amount necessary to construct facilities pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Design-Build Contracts [17250.10. - 17250.52.]

17250.10.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the design-build method of project delivery, using a best value procurement methodology, has been authorized for various agencies that have reported benefits from those projects, including reduced project costs, expedited project completion, and design features that are not achievable through the traditional design-bid-build method.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(1) This chapter provide general authorization for school districts to use the design-build method for projects.

(2) This chapter shall not be deemed to express a preference for the design-build method over other procurement methodologies.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 752, Sec. 2.   (AB 1358)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 17250.50.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.15.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) (1) “Best value” means a value determined by evaluation of objective criteria that may include, but are not limited to, price, features, functions, life-cycle costs, experience, and past performance.

(2) A best value determination may involve the selection of the lowest cost proposal meeting the interests of the school district and the objectives of the project, selection of the best proposal for a stipulated sum established by the procuring school district, or a tradeoff between price and other factors.

(b) “Construction subcontract” means a subcontract awarded by the design-build entity to a subcontractor that will perform work or labor or will render service to the design-build entity in or about the construction of the work or improvement, or a subcontractor licensed by the state which, under subcontract to the design-build entity, specially fabricates and installs a portion of the work or improvement according to detailed drawings contained in the plans and specifications produced by the design-build team.

(c) “Design-build” means a project delivery process in which both the design and construction of a project are procured from a single entity.

(d) “Design-build entity” means a corporation, limited liability company,
 partnership, joint venture, or other legal entity that is able to provide appropriately licensed contracting, architectural, and engineering services, as needed, pursuant to a design-build
 contract.

(e) (1) “Design-build team” means the design-build entity and the individuals or other entities identified by the design-build entity as members of its team.

(2) Members shall include the general contractor and, if utilized in the design of the project, all electrical, mechanical, and plumbing contractors.

(f) “Project” means the construction of any school facility.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 752, Sec. 2.   (AB 1358)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 17250.50.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.20.

(a) A school district, with approval of its governing board, may procure design-build contracts for projects in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000), awarding the contract to either the low bid or the best value.

(b) The school district shall develop guidelines for a standard organizational conflict-of-interest policy, consistent with applicable law, regarding the ability of a person or entity that performs services for the school district relating to the solicitation of a design-build project, to submit a proposal as a design-build entity, or to join a design-build team. This conflict-of-interest policy shall apply to each school district entering into
 design-build contracts authorized under this chapter.

(c) This chapter shall apply to bid requests issued on or after July 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 752, Sec. 2.   (AB 1358)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 17250.50.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.25.

The procurement process for design-build projects shall progress as follows:

(a) (1) The school district shall prepare a set of documents setting forth the scope and estimated price of the project. The documents may include, but are not limited to, the size, type, and desired design character of the project, performance specifications covering the quality of materials, equipment, workmanship, preliminary plans or building layouts, or any other information deemed necessary to describe adequately the school district’s needs. The performance specifications and any plans shall be prepared by a design professional who is duly licensed and registered in California.

(2) The documents shall not include a design-build-operate contract for a project. The documents, however, may include operations during a training or transition period, but shall not include long-term operations for a project.

(b) The school district shall prepare and issue a request for qualifications in order to prequalify, or develop a short list of, the design-build entities whose proposals shall be evaluated for final selection. The request for qualifications shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following elements:

(1) Identification of the basic scope and needs of the project or contract, the expected cost range, the methodology that will be used by the school district to evaluate proposals, the procedure
 for final selection of the design-build entity, and any other information deemed necessary by the school district to inform interested parties of the contracting opportunity.

(2) Significant factors that the school district reasonably expects to consider in evaluating qualifications, including technical design and construction expertise, acceptable safety record, and all other nonprice-related factors.

(3) A standard template request for statements of qualifications prepared by the school district. In preparing the standard template, the school district may consult with the construction industry, the building trades and surety industry, and other school districts interested in using the authorization provided by this chapter. The template shall require the following
 information:

(A) If the design-build entity is a privately held corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or joint venture, a listing of all of the shareholders, partners, or members known at the time of statement of qualification submission who will perform work on the project.

(B) Evidence that the members of the design-build team have completed, or demonstrated the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete, projects of similar size, scope, or complexity, and that the proposed key personnel have sufficient experience and training to competently manage and complete the design and construction of the project, and a financial statement that ensures that the design-build entity has the capacity to complete the project.

(C) The licenses, registration, and credentials required to design and construct the project, including, but not limited to, information on the revocation or suspension of any license, credential, or registration.

(D) Evidence that establishes that the design-build entity has the capacity to obtain all required payment and performance bonding, liability insurance, and errors and omissions insurance.

(E) Information concerning workers’ compensation experience history and a worker safety program.

(F) If the proposed design-build entity is a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other legal entity, a copy of the organizational
 documents or agreement committing to form the organization.

(G) An acceptable safety record. A proposer’s safety record shall be deemed acceptable if its experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period is an average of 1.00 or less, and its average total recordable injury or illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period does not exceed the applicable statistical standards for its business category, or if the proposer is a party to an alternative dispute resolution system, as provided for in Section 3201.5 of the Labor Code.

(4) (A) The information required under this subdivision shall be certified under penalty of perjury by the design-build entity and its general partners or joint venture members.

(B) Information required under this subdivision that is not otherwise a public record under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) shall not be open to public inspection.

(c) (1) A design-build entity shall not be prequalified or short-listed unless the entity provides an enforceable commitment to the school district that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply if any of the following requirements are met:

(A) The school district has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(B) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the school district prior to January 1, 2017.

(C) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the
 project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(d) Based on the documents prepared as described in subdivision (a), the school district shall prepare a request for proposals that invites prequalified or short-listed entities to submit competitive sealed proposals in the manner prescribed by the school district. The request for proposals shall include, but need not be limited to, the following elements:

(1) Identification of the basic scope and needs of the project or contract, the estimated cost of the project, the methodology that will
 be used by the school district to evaluate proposals, whether the contract will be awarded on the basis of low bid or best value, and any other information deemed necessary by the school district to inform interested parties of the contracting opportunity.

(2) Significant factors that the school district reasonably expects to consider in evaluating proposals, including, but not limited to, cost or price and all nonprice-related factors.

(3) The relative importance or the weight assigned to each of the factors identified in the request for proposals.

(4) Where a best value selection method is used, the school district may reserve the right to request proposal revisions and hold discussions and negotiations with responsive proposers,
 in which case the school district shall so specify in the request for proposals and shall publish separately or incorporate into the request for proposals applicable procedures to be observed by the school district to ensure that any discussions or negotiations are conducted in good faith.

(e) For those projects utilizing low bid as the final selection method, the competitive bidding process shall result in lump-sum bids by the prequalified or short-listed design-build entities, and awards shall be made to the design-build entity that is the lowest responsible bidder.

(f) For those projects utilizing best value as a selection method, the design-build competition shall progress as follows:

(1) Competitive proposals
 shall be evaluated by using only the criteria and selection procedures specifically identified in the request for proposals. The following minimum factors, however, shall be weighted as deemed appropriate by the school district:

(A) Price, unless a stipulated sum is specified.

(B) Technical design and construction expertise.

(C) Life-cycle costs over 15 or more years.

(2) Pursuant to subdivision (d), the school district may hold discussions or negotiations with responsive proposers using the process articulated in the school district’s request for proposals.

(3) When the evaluation is complete, the
 responsive proposers shall be ranked based on a determination of value provided, provided that no more than three proposers are required to be ranked.

(4) The award of the contract shall be made to the responsible design-build entity whose proposal is determined by the school district to have offered the best value to the public.

(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon issuance of a contract award, the school district shall publicly announce its award, identifying the design-build entity to which the award is made, along with a statement regarding the basis of the award.

(6) The statement regarding the school district’s contract award, described in paragraph (5), and the contract file shall provide sufficient
 information to satisfy an external audit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 61.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.27.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Project” means all construction, alteration, demolition, installation, repair, and maintenance work that is subject to a project labor agreement that meets the requirements of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(2) “School district” means a school district that operates a labor compliance program that received final approval from the Department of Industrial Relations before January 1, 1997.

(b) A school district entering into a contract awarded pursuant to this
 chapter for a project that is subject to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) shall retain the discretion to do all of the following:

(1) Terminate the contract at any time before a final project design is submitted to the Division of the State Architect for approval.

(2) Modify the project design or feature in a manner the school district decides is necessary to comply with the California Environmental Quality Act, including, but not limited to, incorporation of mitigation measures identified in an environmental review document for the project to mitigate environmental impacts that the project may cause, or the adoption of alternatives to the project.

(3) Balance the benefits of the proposed project against any of the project’s significant environmental effects if the effects cannot be otherwise avoided or mitigated to a less than significant level.

(4) Disapprove the project design and not proceed with the project’s final design and construction.

(c) A contract awarded pursuant to this chapter by a school district for a project shall include terms specifying conditions set forth in subdivision (b) and shall condition the commencement of any activity beyond the design phase of the contract in compliance with applicable laws, including the California Environmental Quality Act.

(d) A design-build entity or its subcontractors performing work on a project for a school district shall not engage in any activity, including demolition, excavation, grading, or construction, under a contract awarded pursuant to this chapter beyond the design phase unless the school district issues a notice pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 21152 of the Public Resources Code, as applicable, and issues a notice to proceed with the construction.

(e) For purposes of procuring and awarding a design-build contract for a project pursuant to this chapter, a school district is deemed to have complied with the California Environmental Quality Act if the
 school district complies with subdivision (b) and a contract awarded pursuant to this chapter contains the terms and conditions described in subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 275, Sec. 1.   (SB 743)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.30.

(a) The design-build entity shall provide payment and performance bonds for the project in the form and in the amount required by the school district, and issued by a California admitted surety. The amount of the payment bond shall not be less than the amount of the performance bond.

(b) The design-build contract shall require errors and omissions insurance coverage for the design elements of the project.

(c) The school district shall develop a standard form of payment and performance bond for its design-build projects.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 752, Sec. 2.   (AB 1358)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 17250.50.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.35.

(a) The school district, in each design-build request for proposals, may identify specific types of subcontractors that must be included in the design-build entity statement of qualifications and proposal. All construction subcontractors that are identified in the proposal shall be afforded all the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) Following award of the design-build contract, the design-build entity shall proceed as follows in awarding construction subcontracts with a value exceeding one-half of 1 percent of the contract price allocable to construction work:

(1) Provide public notice of availability of work to be
 subcontracted in accordance with the publication requirements applicable to the competitive bidding process of the school district, including a fixed date and time on which qualifications statements, bids, or proposals will be due.

(2) Establish reasonable qualification criteria and standards.

(3) Award the subcontract either on a best value basis or to the lowest responsible bidder. The process may include prequalification or short-listing. The foregoing process does not apply to construction subcontractors listed in the original proposal. Subcontractors awarded construction subcontracts under this subdivision shall be afforded all the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 752, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 56.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.40.

(a) If the school district elects to award a project pursuant to this chapter, retention proceeds withheld by the school district from the design-build entity shall not exceed 5 percent.
